Wisconsin, session 2025, AB567.
do enact as follows:AB567,11Section 1. 103.465 (title) of the statutes is amended to read:AB567,2,32103.465 (title) Restrictive covenants Covenants not to compete in 3employment contracts.AB567,24Section 2. 103.465 of the statutes is renumbered 103.465 (2) and amended to 5read:AB567,2,146103.465 (2) Covenants in employment contracts not to compete while 7employed. A covenant by an assistant, servant, employee, or agent not to compete 8with his or her employer or principal during the term of the employment or agency, 9or after the termination of that employment or agency, within a specified territory 10and during a specified time is lawful and enforceable only if the restrictions 11imposed are reasonably necessary for the protection of the employer or principal. 12Any covenant, described in this section, imposing subsection, that imposes an 13unreasonable restraint on trade is illegal, void, and unenforceable even as to any 14part of the covenant or performance that would be a reasonable restraint on trade.AB567,315Section 3. 103.465 (1m) of the statutes is created to read:AB567,2,1616103.465 (1m) Definitions. In this section:AB567,2,1917(a) “Copyright” means a work of authorship, including writings, music, and 18works of art, that has been tangibly expressed and that is protected by the federal 19Copyright Act, 17 USC 101 to 1332, or common law.AB567,2,2220(b) “Customer list” means any information about a customer that is not 21available to a competitor of an employer or principal, including personal 22information and past purchases of goods or services from the employer or principal.AB567,3,21(c) “Intellectual property” means copyrights, patents, trademarks, trade 2secrets, and any other type of commonly recognized intellectual property.AB567,3,53(d) “Nondisclosure agreement” means a written agreement or provision that 4prohibits the disclosure of personal information about an employer or principal or a 5customer of an employer or principal.AB567,3,66(e) “Patent” means a right to an invention protected under 35 USC 251 to 329.AB567,3,77(f) “Trade secret” has the meaning given in s. 134.90 (1) (c).AB567,48Section 4. 103.465 (3) and (4) of the statutes are created to read:AB567,3,179103.465 (3) Covenants in employment contracts not to compete after 10termination of employment or agency. A covenant by an assistant, servant, 11employee, or agent not to compete with his or her employer or principal after the 12termination of the employment or agency imposes an unreasonable restraint on 13trade and is illegal, void, and unenforceable even as to any part of the covenant that 14would be a reasonable restraint on trade. This subsection does not apply to a 15nondisclosure agreement or to a covenant not to compete that is limited to 16prohibiting or restricting the unauthorized use of a customer list or intellectual 17property owned or licensed by the employer or principal.AB567,4,218(4) Notice posted. Each employer and principal shall post, in one or more 19conspicuous places where notices to assistants, servants, employees, and agents are 20customarily posted, and in a conspicuous place on the employer’s or principal’s 21website, if the employer or principal maintains a website, a notice in a form 22approved by the department that explains that covenants not to compete after 1termination of employment or agency, subject to the exceptions in sub. (3), are an 2unreasonable restraint on trade and are illegal, void, and unenforceable.AB567,53Section 5. Initial applicability.AB567,4,64(1) Covenant not to compete in employment contracts. This act first 5applies to a covenant not to compete that is entered into, extended, modified, or 6renewed on the effective date of this subsection.AB567,4,77